Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-720 Expenses in estate
litigation. If any personal representative or person nominated as personal
representative defends or prosecutes any proceeding in good faith, whether
successful or not that person is entitled to receive from the estate that
person's necessary expenses and disbursements including reasonable attorneys'
fees incurred. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Case Notes

A finding of undue influence on the part of the personal
representative, who was also the proponent of the rejected will, precludes a
finding that he or she defended or prosecuted the will contest in good faith;
personal representative's request for attorneys' fees and expenses under this
section thus denied. 91 H. 107, 979 P.2d 1133.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next